Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 641.165, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Acts prohibited. (a) Whoever deleted text begin introduces or in any manner causes the introduction of contraband, as defined in subdivision 1, into any jail, lockup, or correctional facility, as defined in section 241.021, subdivision 1, without the consent of the person in charge, ordeleted text end is found in possession of contraband deleted text begin while within the facilitydeleted text end new text begin , as defined in subdivision 1, in any jail, lockup, or correctional facility, as defined in section 241.021, subdivision 1,new text end or upon the grounds thereof, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. (b) new text begin Whoever introduces or in any manner causes the introduction of contraband, as defined in subdivision 1, into any jail, lockup, or correctional facility, as defined in section 241.021, subdivision 1, without the consent of the person in charge, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years.new text end new text begin (c) new text end Whoever introduces or in any manner causes the introduction of a dangerous weapon, as defined in section 609.02, subdivision 6, into any jail, lockup, or correctional facility, as defined in section 241.021, subdivision 1, without the consent of the person in charge, or is found in possession of a dangerous weapon while within the facility or upon the grounds thereof, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years.